Illinois, session 104th, SB3149.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 12-502 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/12-502)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 12-502)7    Sec. 12-502. Mirrors. 8    (a) Every motor vehicle, operated singly or when towing 9another vehicle, shall be equipped with a mirror so located as 10to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance 11of at least 200 feet to the rear of such motor vehicle.12    (b) A public transit agency may use an electronic rearview 13monitoring system on commercial motor vehicles owned by the 14agency as an alternative to the requirements of this Section 15and the mirror requirements of 49 CFR 393.80 so long as an 16exemption to 49 CFR 393.80 granted by the Federal Motor 17Carrier Safety Administration remains in effect.18    The electronic rearview monitoring system shall be 19equipped with any combination of lens or surface coatings, 20electrical circuits, or mechanical devices designed to prevent 21the buildup of ice and water on surfaces that might obstruct 22the view presented by the electronic rearview monitoring 23system. The electronic rearview monitoring system shall not be   SB3149 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19152 LNS 32597 b1equipped with audio or video recording capabilities. The 2electronic rearview monitoring system shall not be equipped 3with facial recognition software or used in conjunction with 4facial recognition software.5    For purposes of this subsection, "video recording" means a 6device capable of making a videotape, photograph, film, or 7other electronic or digital recording of a still or moving 8visual image. 9(Source: P.A. 82-122.)